src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
### Multiple Semantic tags: 
* **+Sem/Act_Fruit** 
* **+Sem/Act_Group** Activity and Group 
* **+Sem/Act_Plc**   A persons job is an activity, and a place as well 
* **+Sem/Act_Route** Activity and Route, ie johtolat 
* **+Sem/Amount_Build**   Amount and Building 
* **+Sem/Amount_Semcon** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Body-abstr_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Build** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Build-part** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Build_Hum_Txt** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Group** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Group_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Group_Prod-vis** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Hum_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Hum_Time** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Plc_Txt** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Time** 
* **+Sem/Ani_Veh** 
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Obj-clo** 
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Perc-phys** 
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Plc_Route** 
* **+Sem/Body-abstr_Feat-cogn** 
* **+Sem/Body-abstr_Prod-audio_Semcon** 
* **+Sem/Body_Body-abstr** 
* **+Sem/Body_Clth** 
* **+Sem/Body_Food** 
* **+Sem/Body_Group_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Body_Group_Hum_Time** 
* **+Sem/Body_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Body_Mat** 
* **+Sem/Body_Measr** 
* **+Sem/Body_Obj_Tool-catch** 
* **+Sem/Body_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Body_Plc-elevate** 
* **+Sem/Body_Time** 
* **+Sem/Build-part_Cat** 
* **+Sem/Build-part_Cat_Ctain** 
* **+Sem/Build-part_Cat_Ctain_Mat** 
* **+Sem/Build-part_Ctain** 
* **+Sem/Build-part_Ctain_Mat** 
* **+Sem/Build-part_Ctain_Obj** 
* **+Sem/Build-part_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Build_Build-part** 
* **+Sem/Build_Clth-part** 
* **+Sem/Build_Edu_Org** 
* **+Sem/Build_Event_Org** 
* **+Sem/Build_Obj** 
* **+Sem/Build_Org** 
* **+Sem/Build_Route** 
* **+Sem/Cat_Group_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Cat_Group_Hum_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr** 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr_Obj** 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr_Obj_Org** 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Fruit** 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Money** 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Org** 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Plant** 
* **+Sem/Clth_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Clth_Obj-clo** 
* **+Sem/Ctain-abstr_Org** 
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth_Plant** 
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth_Veh** 
* **+Sem/Ctain_Feat-phys** 
* **+Sem/Ctain_Furn** 
* **+Sem/Ctain_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Ctain_Tool** 
* **+Sem/Ctain_Tool-measr** 
* **+Sem/Curr_Org** 
* **+Sem/Dance_Org** 
* **+Sem/Dance_Prod-audio** 
* **+Sem/Domain_Food-med** 
* **+Sem/Domain_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Domain_Prod-audio** 
* **+Sem/Drink_Plant** 
* **+Sem/Edu_Event** 
* **+Sem/Edu_Geom** 
* **+Sem/Edu_Group_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Edu_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Edu_Mat** 
* **+Sem/Edu_Org** 
* **+Sem/Event_Food** 
* **+Sem/Event_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Event_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Event_Plc-elevate** 
* **+Sem/Event_Time** 
* **+Sem/Feat-measr_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Tool-write** 
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Veh** 
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Wthr** 
* **+Sem/Feat-psych_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Feat-psych_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Feat_Plant** 
* **+Sem/Food_Obj-surfc** 
* **+Sem/Food_Perc-phys** 
* **+Sem/Food_Plant** 
* **+Sem/Fruit_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Game_Obj-play** 
* **+Sem/Geom_Hum_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Geom_Obj** 
* **+Sem/Group_Hum** 
* **+Sem/Group_Hum_Org** 
* **+Sem/Group_Hum_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Group_Hum_Prod-vis** 
* **+Sem/Group_Org** 
* **+Sem/Group_Prod-vis** 
* **+Sem/Group_Sign** 
* **+Sem/Group_Txt** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Lang** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Lang_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Lang_Time** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Mat_Tool** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Obj** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Org** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Plant** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Plc** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Sign** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Tool** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Tool-it** = Human 
* **+Sem/Hum_Veh** 
* **+Sem/Hum_Wthr** 
* **+Sem/Lang_Tool** 
* **+Sem/Mat_Plant** 
* **+Sem/Mat_Txt** 
* **+Sem/Measr_Sign** = Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation) 
* **+Sem/Measr_Time** 
* **+Sem/Money_Obj** 
* **+Sem/Money_Part** 
* **+Sem/Money_Txt** 
* **+Sem/Obj-ling_Obj-surfc** 
* **+Sem/Obj-play** 
* **+Sem/Obj-play_Sport** 
* **+Sem/Obj_Semcon** 
* **+Sem/Obj_Sign** 
* **+Sem/Obj_State** 
* **+Sem/Obj_Symbol** 
* **+Sem/Obj_Veh** 
* **+Sem/Oeuvre** (not used so far (?)), note oeu- 
* **+Sem/Oeuvre-txt** (so far only Biblija, changed to Sem/Txt) 
* **+Sem/Org_Prod-audio** 
* **+Sem/Org_Prod-cogn** 
* **+Sem/Org_Prod-vis** 
* **+Sem/Org_Rule** 
* **+Sem/Org_Txt** 
* **+Sem/Org_Veh** 
* **+Sem/Part_Prod-cogn** 
* **+Sem/Part_Substnc** 
* **+Sem/Perc-emo_Wthr** 
* **+Sem/Plant_Plant-part** 
* **+Sem/Plant_Tool** 
* **+Sem/Plant_Tool-measr** 
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr_Rel_State** 
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr_Route** 
* **+Sem/Plc_Pos** 
* **+Sem/Plc_Route** 
* **+Sem/Plc_State** 
* **+Sem/Plc_Substnc** 
* **+Sem/Plc_Substnc_Wthr** 
* **+Sem/Plc_Time** 
* **+Sem/Plc_Time_Wthr** 
* **+Sem/Plc_Tool-catch** 
* **+Sem/Plc_Wthr** 
* **+Sem/Prod-audio_Txt** 
* **+Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt** 
* **+Sem/Semcon_Txt** 
* **+Sem/State-sick_Substnc** 
* **+Sem/Substnc_Wthr** 
* **+Sem/Time_Wthr** 

### Clitic 
* **+Clt** 
* **+Qst** Question particle -a 
* **+Qst/a** Question particle -a 
* **+Qst/ko** Question particle -ko might be used with Use/NG  
* **+Qst/ǥo** 
* **+Qst/go** 
* **+Foc/AA** more specifically, exactly, contrast. used with Pron and Adv 
* **+Foc/o** 
* **+Foc/i** This might be used with 
* **+Foc/han** This might be used with Use/NG 
* **+Foc/ka** This might be used with Use/NG ij-ka 
* **+Foc/kahan** 
* **+Foc/ǥa** 
* **+Foc/ga** 
* **+Foc/ki** This might be used with Use/NG 
* **+Foc/son** 
* **+Foc/jõs** 
* **+Foc/õs** 
* **+Foc/ǥõs** 
* **+Foc/mes** 
* **+Foc/ba** 
* **+Foc/âs** 
* **+Foc/ât** 
* **+Foc/tâma** 
* **+Foc/tõt** 
* **+Foc/šât** 

### Tags distinguishing different versions of the same lemma (before POS) 
In the xml the varid attribute is used in the st element with a mere numeric value 
an extra lemma attribute is inserted in the st element, e.g. lemma="tõlvvad" 
* **+v1** 
* **+v2** 
* **+v3** 
* **+v4** 
* **+v5** 
* **+v6** 
* **+v7** 
* **+v8** 
* **+v9** 
* **+v10** 
* **+v11** 
* **+v12** 
* **+v13** 
* **+v14** 
* **+v15** 
* **+v16** 
* **+v17** 
* **+v18** 
* **+v19** 
* **+v20** 
* **+v21** 
* **+v22** 
* **+v23** 
* **+v24** 

### Other tags 

* **+ABBR** = Abbreviation 
* **+ACR** = Acronym 
* **+Symbol** = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, © 
* **+CLB** = Clause border (full stop, comma..) 
* **+CLBfinal** = Sentence final abbreviated expression ending in full stop, the full stop is ambiguous
* **+PUNCT** = punctuation 
* **+LEFT** = left paranthesis 
* **+RIGHT +MIDDLE** = right paranthesis 
* **+Prefix** = prefix 
* **+Dyn** = Dynamically generated (acronyms) 
* **^GUESSNOUNROOT** 

### Punctuation 
* **+HYPH** 

## Letters 

### Skolt Saami letters 
These definitions are probably not needed 
* **č** 
* **đ** 
* **š** 
* **ŧ** 
* **ž** 
* **Ʒ** 
* **ǥ** 
* **ǧ** 
* **ǩ** 
* **Ǯ** 
* **ǯ** 
* **Ǥ** 

### Archiphonemes 

These are for letters with special behaviour. 
Say that all m-s change to n in a given context, 
but not this m, because it is m2. 
In twolc these are then defined m2:m, etc, i.e. 
the m2 is an m, although it is a different m. 

## Diacritic marks 
These symbol govern the way the morphophonological rules treat the affix string. 

This project started out using arbitrary names, X1, X2..., but since they were 
hard to remember, we changed to (a bit) more transparent names (^DIADEL, ...). 
On the TODO-list: Change all X1, X2, ... to easy-to-remember names. 

## Consonant lengthening 
* **%{XC%}** 

## Vowel length and height 
* **%{õuØ%}** 
* **%{ouØ%}** 
* **%{âõØ%}** 
* **%{ẹiØ%}** 
* **%{äaØ%}** 
* **%{äåØ%}** 
* **%{eiØ%}** 
* **%{åoØ%}** 
* **%{ẹeiØ%}** 

for vowel height, by default vowels are low. 
* **%{õu%}** 
* **%{ou%}** 
* **%{âõ%}** 
* **%{ẹi%}** 
* **%{äa%}** 
* **%{äå%}** 
* **%{ei%}** 
* **%{åo%}** 
* **%{ẹei%}** 
* **%{âõe%}** 
* **%{âõäe%}** 

## In Skolt Saami, triggers are used for signaling change in the preceding stem 2025.09.16
Two or more alternations may occur in the stem simultaneously,
they should be addressed separately -- not as portmanteau features of length as in sme.
Two codas may be simultaneous loci of alternation,
so we need to remember where the triggers point to, and we need to know
what order they are in.
Here is what may happen in the final coda of a stem when it is the sole locus of alternation:
**jiẹˈʹnstem**: jeäʹnˈn+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1
‹iẹ› diphthong alternation: vowel raising, vowel tinting
‹ˈ› allegro marking following the diphthong
‹ʹ› palatal suprasegment marking
‹n› allegro marking of what was a long consonant, but which has been
reduced to single allegro consonant before a consonant cluster
that is secondarily following the extra short coda vowel
The ordering of phenomena is
(so we should work towards this in trigger ordering) 2025-09-16 needs adjustment
1: Vowel height
2: Vowel length, which here is Allegro vowel
3: Palatal marker (soft sign)
4: Consonant length, quality (still portmanteau)
5: Palatal marking in alternations {kǩ}, {gǧ}, {ǥj}
Other words to consider
**jiẹˈʹrjsted**: jeäʹrǧǧ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2
**jieˈʹrjsted**: jiârgg+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2

Words with two codas undergoing variation simultaneously will
feature additional trigger work where the triggers are each
preceded by a %^PEN trigger, which indicates penultimate.
Orderwise, penultimate triggers appear closer to the stem (see Rueter forthcomingXXX)

CHARACTERISTIC BREAKDOWN 2015-02-17 
* __%^Allegro__ - Allegro in general shortens consonant and preceding vowel
* **%^VV2V** Shortens vowel 
* **%^V2VV** Lengthens vowel 
* **%^CC2C** Shortens consonant 
* **%^CC2CAllegro** Shortens consonant 
* **%^C2CC** Lengthens consonant 
* **%^CC2CCC** Strong to Extra Strong consonant 
* **%^CCC2C** Extra Strong to Weak consonant 
* **%^CCC2CAllegro** Extra Strong to Weak consonant 
* **%^CCC2CC** Extra Strong to Strong consonant 
* **%^YXX2YX** Shortens consonant cluster 
* **%^YXX2VX** Consonant cluster to vowel and consonant sijdd:siid 
* **%^YXX2VXX** Consonant cluster to vowel and geminate uvdd:ouʹdd 
* **%^YXX2IX** Consonant cluster to i  and consonant kueʹhtt:kueiʹt 
* **%^VX2YXX** Consonant cluster i/u to j/v 
* **%^VXX2YXX** Consonant cluster i/u to j/v 
* **%^KKK2GG** Geminate weakening 
* **%^KKK2G** Strong Geminate allegro 
* **%^KK2GG** Geminate weakening     jokk:jooǥǥ 
* **%^K2GG** Geminate weakening čårrõs:čårrõõzz 
* **%^KK2GAllegro** Geminate weakening    in allegro pååss:påz 
* **%^K2GAllegro** Geminate weakening    in allegro čâustõk 
* **%^APen** for combinations 2015-10-04 Jack 
* **%^Pen** for combinations 2015-09-28 Miikka 
* **%^KK2ZERO** Geminate weakening nââʹer 
* **%^J2I** in tuâjj:tuâi 
* **%^I2J** in agent names 
* **%^I2Zero** in agent names 
* **%{ʹØ%}** Modifier Letter prime 
* **%{ʼØ%}** used between l, n, j and subsequent j and elsewhere 
* **%{ˈ1%}** This is modifier letter verticle line after diphthongs 

## Gradation triggers 2015.01.23 
* **%^XSt2St** Causes weakening from extra strong to strong 
* **%^XSt2W** Causes weakening from extra strong to weak 
* **%^St2W** Causes weakening from strong to weak 
* **%^W2St** Causes strengthening from weak to strong 
* **%^W2XSt** Causes strengthening from weak to extra strong 
* **%^St2XSt** Causes strengthening from strong to extra strong 

Gradation triggers 2015.02.09 For   Consonant Clusters 
* **%^XSt2StCluster** Causes weakening from extra strong to strong in clusters 
* **%^St2XStCluster** Causes strengthening from strong to extra strong in clusters 

### Diacritic with mnemonic names 
